New York, session 2025-2026, S4378.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph 3 of subsection (b) of section 3217-a of the 2 insurance law, as added by chapter 705 of the laws of 1996, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 (3) provide a copy of the most recent individual, direct pay subscrib- 5 er contracts and, upon the written request of an individual covered 6 under a group contract which was the subject of collective bargaining, 7 provide a copy of such contract within thirty days of the receipt of 8 such request; 9 § 2. Paragraph 3 of subsection (b) of section 4324 of the insurance 10 law, as added by chapter 705 of the laws of 1996, is amended to read as 11 follows: 12 (3) provide a copy of the most recent individual, direct pay subscrib- 13 er contracts and, upon the written request of an individual covered 14 under a group contract which was the subject of collective bargaining, 15 provide a copy of such contract within thirty days of the receipt of 16 such request; 17 § 3. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 2 of section 4408 of the public 18 health law, as added by chapter 705 of the laws of 1996, is amended to 19 read as follows: 20 (c) provide a copy of the most recent individual, direct pay subscrib- 21 er contracts and, upon the written request of an individual covered 22 under a group contract which was the subject of collective bargaining, 23 provide a copy of such contract within thirty days of the receipt of 24 such request; 25 § 4. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 26 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05807-01-5